Arkansas, session 2025, SB274.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 26, Chapter 52, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
26-52-457. Caskets, burial vaults, and monuments.
(a) The first one thousand dollars ($1,000) of the gross receipts or
gross proceeds derived from the sale of the following are exempt from the
gross receipts tax levied by this chapter and the compensating use tax levied
by the Arkansas Compensating Tax Act of 1949, § 26-53-101 et seq.:
(1) A casket;
(2) A burial vault; or
(3) A monument.
(b) The exemption provided under subsection (a) of this section may be
*JLL239*
02/24/2025 10:17:45 AM JLL239

SB274
administered as a rebate.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is
effective on the first day of the calendar quarter following the effective
date of this act.































02/24/2025 10:17:45 AM JLL239